Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3500 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Municipalities shall be permitted to use funds from their
general revenue budgets for the purpose of purchasing one-way bus
tickets out of the State of Oklahoma for persons without a permanent
residence.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10025 MJ 03/25/26



Req. No. 10025 Page 1